New York, session 2025-2026, A4008.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 915-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 915-a. Prohibiting the sale of foods containing Red Dye 3 and Red 4 Dye 40. From the beginning of the school day until the end of the last 5 scheduled meal period, no foods or beverages containing Red Dye 3 or Red 6 Dye 40, shall be sold in any public school within the state. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 8 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06808-01-5